Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.456

Restrictions on approval of conversions.

If a member of a converting limited liability company or constituent limited liability company will have personal liability with respect to a converted organization or surviving organization, then, in addition to the applicable approval requirements in RCW 25.15.441(1) or 25.15.421(1)(a), approval of a plan of conversion or plan of merger must also require the execution, by each such member, of a separate written consent to become subject to such personal liability.

[ 2015 c 188 s 88.]